Connecticut, session 2026, SB00442.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. (Effective from passage) The Comptroller, in consultation
2 with organizations designated as the exclusive representative of a
3 paraeducator unit, shall conduct a study on retirement health benefits
4 for paraeducators. Such study shall include, but need not be limited to,
5 (1) what, if any, retirement health benefits paraeducators currently
6 receive, and (2) any recommendations for legislation concerning the
7 improvement of retirement health benefits for paraeducators. Not later
8 than January 1, 2027, the Comptroller shall submit a report of the results
9 of such study to the joint standing committee of the General Assembly
10 having cognizance of matters relating to labor and public employees, in
11 accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a of the general statutes.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
SB442 / File No. 312 1

SB442 File No. 312
Section 1 from passage New section
LAB Joint Favorable
SB442 / File No. 312 2

SB442 File No. 312
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill requires the Comptroller to study retirement health benefits
of paraeducators and does not result in a fiscal impact since the agency
has the expertise to meet the requirements of the bill.
SB442 / File No. 312 3

SB442 File No. 312
OLR Bill Analysis
SB 442
AN ACT CONCERNING A STUDY OF RETIREMENT HEALTH
BENEFITS FOR PARAEDUCATORS.